Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3512
Operator, defined.

Operator shall mean the agency, person, or group of persons designated by the governing body of the jurisdiction served by a criminal history record information system to coordinate and supervise the system.

Laws 1978, LB 713, § 12.